New York, session 2025-2026, S8819.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 410-z of the social services law, as amended by a 2 chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the social services law relating to 3 requiring social services districts to maintain a waiting list of 4 certain families applying for child care assistance, as proposed in 5 legislative bills numbers S. 1926 and A. 7145, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 § 410-z. Reporting requirements. [1.] Each social services district 8 shall collect and submit to the office of children and family services, 9 in such form and at such times as specified by the office of children 10 and family services, such data and information regarding child care 11 assistance provided under the block grant as the office of children and 12 family services may need to comply with federal reporting requirements. 13 [2. (a) Each social services district shall maintain a waiting list 14 of eligible families who have applied for child care assistance pursuant 15 to this title and who have not received such assistance. Such waiting 16 list shall contain information including, but not limited to: 17 (i) the date the child care assistance was requested; 18 (ii) the date the child care assistance was received; 19 (iii) the age of the child or children the assistance was requested on 20 behalf of; and 21 (iv) the total number of families on such waiting list as of the first 22 day of each month. 23 (b) Each district shall issue a report to the office of children and 24 family services by October fifteenth, two thousand twenty-seven, and 25 annually thereafter detailing month-to-month information required pursu- 26 ant to this subdivision for the preceding period of October first 27 through September thirtieth, and shall include the following: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05769-02-6 S. 8819 2 1 (i) the average length of time for families on the waiting list; 2 (ii) the number of families on the waiting list for each of the 3 following time periods: 4 (A) less than two weeks, 5 (B) two weeks to less than a month, 6 (C) one month to less than three months, 7 (D) three months to less than six months, 8 (E) six months to less than a year, and 9 (F) one year or more; 10 (iii) the average age of children represented on the waiting list; 11 (iv) the number of children represented on the waiting list eligible 12 for each: 13 (A) infant, 14 (B) toddler, 15 (C) pre-school, and 16 (D) school-aged subsidized child care slots; and 17 (v) the number of existing infant, toddler, pre-school and school-aged 18 subsidized child care slots; 19 (vi) the number of families who would receive child care assistance 20 except that they are waiting for available slots in a particular child 21 care program; and 22 (vii) other information as the district deems appropriate. 23 3. (a) Each social services district shall collect data regarding the 24 income of families who applied for child care assistance pursuant to 25 this title, specifying: 26 (i) the number of families who were denied; 27 (ii) the number of families who received such assistance; and 28 (iii) a listing of the incomes pursuant to paragraph (b) of this 29 subdivision of the families who applied for such assistance. 30 (b) Each district shall issue a report to the office of children and 31 family services by October fifteenth, two thousand twenty-seven, and 32 annually thereafter, detailing month-to-month information collected 33 pursuant to this subdivision for the preceding period of October first 34 through September thirtieth, and shall include the following: 35 (i) the number of all families who applied for and received child care 36 assistance pursuant to this title whose: 37 (A) incomes were under fifty percent of the state median income level 38 for their family size, 39 (B) incomes were between fifty percent and seventy-five percent of the 40 state median income level for their family size, and 41 (C) incomes were between seventy-five and eighty-five percent of the 42 state median income level for their family size; and 43 (ii) the number of all families who applied for and were denied child 44 care assistance pursuant to this title whose: 45 (A) incomes were under fifty percent of the state median income level 46 for their family size, 47 (B) incomes were between fifty percent and seventy-five percent of the 48 state median income level for their family size, and 49 (C) incomes were between seventy-five percent and eighty-five percent 50 of the state median income level for their family size. 51 4. The office of children and family services shall compile such 52 reports pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision two, and paragraph (b) 53 of subdivision three of this section, into one comprehensive report 54 containing all required information on a county by county basis. Such 55 report shall be provided to the governor, the speaker of the assembly, 56 the temporary president of the senate, the chairperson of the assembly S. 8819 3 1 committee on children and families, the chairperson of the senate 2 committee on children and families, the chairperson of the assembly 3 committee on social services, the chairperson of the senate committee on 4 social services, the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit- 5 tee and the chairperson of the senate finance committee no later than 6 December first, two thousand twenty-seven, and annually thereafter. 7 5. Reports issued and compiled under this section shall not use the 8 name, address, or any other identifying information of an individual who 9 is the subject of the report and shall ensure the anonymity of those 10 included in the reports.] 11 § 2. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 410-aa 12 to read as follows: 13 § 410-aa. Waitlist requirements. 1. Each social services district 14 shall maintain a waiting list of families who have applied for child 15 care assistance pursuant to this title but have not been authorized for 16 such assistance due to a lack of available funds under either the 17 district's allocation from the state child care block grant program or 18 any local funds appropriated for such program. Such waiting list shall 19 contain: 20 (a) the date the child care assistance was requested; 21 (b) the date the eligibility determination or redetermination was 22 made; 23 (c) the age of the child or children the assistance was requested on 24 behalf of; 25 (d) whether the family was a new applicant or recertifying; and 26 (e) the total number of families on such waiting list. 27 2. The office shall post annually on their website the total number of 28 families on the waitlist for each social services district. 29 3. (a) Each social services district shall collect data regarding the 30 families who applied for child care assistance pursuant to this title, 31 specifying: 32 (i) the number of families who were denied because they were deter- 33 mined ineligible for assistance, including: (A) the family size, (B) the 34 income of those families, where available; and (C) the age of the child, 35 where available; 36 (ii) the number of families who were placed on a waitlist, including: 37 (A) the family size; (B) the income of those families, where available; 38 and (C) the age of the child, where available; and 39 (iii) the number of families who received such assistance, including: 40 (A) the family size; (B) the income of those families, where available; 41 and (C) the age of the child, where available. 42 (b) Each social services district shall provide the information 43 collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision to the office 44 annually. The office shall re-post this information on their website 45 upon receipt. 46 § 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require local social 47 services districts to maintain waiting lists for dates preceding the 48 effective date of this act, or to collect data pursuant to subdivision 2 49 of section 410-aa of the social services law, as added by section two of 50 this act, for persons who applied for subsidized child care prior to the 51 effective date of this act. 52 § 4. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 53 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the social services law 54 relating to requiring social services districts to maintain a waiting 55 list of certain families applying for child care assistance, as proposed 56 in legislative bills numbers S. 1926 and A. 7145, takes effect.